src/fst/test/gt-desc-yamls/N-I-astotin_gt-desc.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/fst/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph:  ../../../src/fst/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
  App: lookup

Tests:

  Lemma - astotin :

     astotin+N+I+Sg: astotin
     astotin+N+I+Pl: astotina
     astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: nitastotin
     astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl: nitastotina
     astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Sg: otastotin
     astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: otastotina
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Sg: [ascocinis, ascocinisîs]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg: [nicascocinis, nicascocinisîs]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl: [ocascocinisa, ocascocinisîsa]
     # Non-standard forms
     astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: nitastotinim
     astotin+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: nitastotinima
     astotin+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: otastotinima
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Sg+Err/Thm: [nicascocinimis, nicascocinimisîs, nicascocinisim, nicascocinisîsim, nicascocinisim, nicascocinisîsim, nicascocinimisim, nicascocinimisîsim]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px1Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: [nicascocinimisa, nicascocinimisîsa, nicascocinisima, nicascocinisîsima, nicascocinisima, nicascocinisîsima, nicascocinimisima, nicascocinimisîsima]
     astotin+N+I+Der/Dim+N+I+Px3Sg+Pl+Err/Thm: [ocascocinimisa, ocascocinimisîsa, ocascocinisima, ocascocinisîsima, ocascocinisima, ocascocinisîsima, ocascocinimisima, ocascocinimisîsima]
